District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.54

Venue and process.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 286, Pub. L. 87-569, § 54
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-301.54.
1981 Ed., § 29-555.
1973 Ed., § 29-1054.

Prior Codifications